Hawaii statutes.
§122A-11 Employment. Whenever the
governor determines that, because of invasion, insurrection, riot, civil
disorder, unlawful combination or conspiracy, catastrophe, natural or human
caused disaster, or imminent danger thereof, the public safety and order cannot
be preserved or the laws cannot be enforced by the civil authorities or the
national guard, or as otherwise provided by law, the governor may call the
Hawaii state defense force, or such part of it as may be required, into the
active service of the State for the duration of the condition which required
its call. [L 1987, c 35, pt of §1; am L 1988, c 135, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next